Utah statutes.
67-1a-11.   Commission on Civic and Character Education -- Duties and
responsibilities.
The commission shall:
(1)  promote supportive coalitions and collaborative efforts to develop public
awareness, and training regarding the provisions of Section 53A-13-109 in
recognition that the cultivation of a continuing understanding and
appreciation of representative democracy in Utah and the United States among
succeeding generations of educated and responsible citizens is important to
the nation and state; and
(2)  provide leadership to the state's continuous focus on civic and character
education in the public schools and institutions of higher education and make
recommendations to local school boards and school administrators.
